Illinois, session 104th, HB4735.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Transparency in Downcoding Act. 6    Section 2. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) Downcoding of medical claims, when done without 8    clear justification or transparency, undermines fair 9    payment of health care providers and threatens the 10    stability of physician practices.11        (2) Improper downcoding may result in harm to patients 12    by disincentivizing care for individuals with complex 13    medical conditions.14        (3) It is in the public interest to ensure that all 15    coding adjustments are clinically supported, transparent, 16    appealable, and free from discriminatory targeting. 17    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:18    "CARC" means Claim Adjustment Reason Codes, which provide 19the reason for a financial adjustment specific to a particular 20claim or service referenced in the transmitted Accredited 21Standards Committee (ASC) X12 835 standard transaction adopted 22by the United States Department of Health and Human Services   HB4735- 2 -LRB104 19666 BAB 33115 b1under 45 CFR 162.1602.2    "Downcoding" means the unilateral alteration by a health 3insurance issuer of the level of evaluation and management 4service code or other service code submitted on a claim, 5resulting in a lower payment.6    "Health insurance issuer" has the meaning given to that 7term in Section 5 of the Illinois Health Insurance Portability 8and Accountability Act.9    "RARC" means Remittance Advice Remark Codes, which provide 10supplemental information about a financial adjustment 11indicated by a CARC or information about remittance 12processing. 13    Section 10. Applicability; scope. 14    (a) This Act applies to the following if they are issued, 15amended, delivered, or renewed on or after the effective date 16of this Act:17        (1) a policy or contract for health insurance coverage 18    as defined in the Illinois Health Insurance Portability 19    and Accountability Act; 20        (2) State, employee, unit of local government, or 21    school district health plans; and22        (3) policies issued or delivered in this State to the 23    Department of Healthcare and Family Services and providing 24    coverage to persons who are enrolled under the Medical 25    Assistance Article of the Illinois Public Aid Code or   HB4735- 3 -LRB104 19666 BAB 33115 b1    under the Children's Health Insurance Program Act. 2    This Act does not apply to employee or employer 3self-insured health benefit plans under the federal Employee 4Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 and health care 5provided pursuant to the Workers' Compensation Act or the 6Workers' Occupational Diseases Act.7    (b) This Act does not diminish a health care plan's duties 8and responsibilities under other federal or State law or the 9rules adopted thereunder.10    (c) This Act is not intended to alter or impede the 11provisions of any consent decree or judicial order to which 12the State or any of its agencies is a party. 13    Section 15. Prohibition of automatic downcoding.14    (a) A health insurance issuer shall not use an automated 15process, system, or tool to downcode a claim. For the purposes 16of this Section, use of an automated tool includes, but is not 17limited to, the use of artificial intelligence.18    (b) Downcoding decisions shall be made by a physician 19licensed to practice medicine in all its branches in any 20United States jurisdiction and of the same or similar 21specialty as a physician who typically manages the medical 22condition or disease. The physician who makes the downcoding 23decision shall perform a documented review of the clinical 24information supporting the billed service.   HB4735- 4 -LRB104 19666 BAB 33115 b1    Section 20. Prohibition on diagnosis-based downcoding. A 2health insurance issuer shall not downcode a claim based 3solely on the reported diagnosis codes. 4    Section 25. Notification requirements for downcoded 5claims. When a claim is downcoded, the health insurance issuer 6shall notify the physician using the appropriate CARC and RARC 7to clearly indicate that the claim has been downcoded and 8provide:9        (1) the specific reason for the downcoding, including 10    reference to the clinical criteria used to justify the 11    downcoding;12        (2) the original and revised service codes and payment 13    amounts;14        (3) the National Provider Identifier of the physician 15    who is responsible for the downcoding decision and the 16    physician's credentials, board certifications, and areas 17    of specialty expertise and training; and18        (4) a notice of the right to appeal as described in 19    Section 30. 20    Section 30. Appeal process for downcoded claims.21    (a) A health insurance issuer shall provide physicians 22with a clear and accessible process for appealing downcoded 23claims, including a written or electronic notice detailing how 24to initiate an appeal, contact information for the physician   HB4735- 5 -LRB104 19666 BAB 33115 b1managing the appeal, reasonable timelines for submission of an 2appeal that are no less than 180 days, and timelines for 3adjudication of the appeal consistent with applicable State 4law or regulations governing utilization review.5    (b) Physicians shall have the right to appeal in batches 6of similar claims involving substantially similar downcoding 7issues, without restriction.8    (c) A health insurance issuer must ensure that all appeals 9are reviewed by a physician. The physician must: 10        (1) be licensed to practice medicine in all its 11    branches in any United States jurisdiction; 12        (2) be of the same or similar specialty as a physician 13    who typically manages the medical condition or disease; 14        (3) be knowledgeable of, and have experience 15    providing, the health care services under appeal; 16        (4) not have been directly involved in making the 17    decision to downcode the claim; and 18        (5) perform a documented review of the clinical 19    information supporting the billed service, including, but 20    not limited to, a review of all pertinent medical records 21    provided to the health insurance issuer and any medical 22    literature provided to the health insurance issuer by the 23    appealing physician. 24    Section 35. Protections for patients with chronic 25conditions.  HB4735- 6 -LRB104 19666 BAB 33115 b1    (a) A health insurance issuer shall not use downcoding 2practices in a targeted or discriminatory manner against 3physicians who routinely treat patients with complex or 4chronic conditions.5    (b) Any pattern or practice of discriminatory downcoding 6identified by the Director of Insurance or another regulatory 7authority shall be subject to enforcement actions, including 8fines, restitution, or suspension of the health insurance 9issuer's license in this State. 10    Section 40. Enforcement and penalties. Violations of this 11Act shall be enforceable by the Department of Insurance and 12may include, but are not limited to:13        (1) monetary penalties of up to $50,000 per violation; 14    and15        (2) orders to reprocess improperly downcoded claims 16    with interest. 17    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 18severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.